Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6916
Medical emergency; sexual assault or incest; written certification.

(1) If a physician performs or induces an abortion because of a medical emergency pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of section 71-6915, the physician shall certify in writing that a medical emergency existed and explain the medical emergency in the written certification. The physician shall keep the written certification in the woman's medical record.

(2) If a physician performs or induces an abortion in the case of sexual assault or incest pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 71-6915, the physician shall certify in writing that the abortion was performed because of sexual assault or incest and that the physician complied with all applicable duties imposed by section 28-902. The physician shall keep the written certification in the woman's medical record.

Laws 2023, LB574, § 5.